parSem/xip/dev/GRAMMARS/GERMAN/FST1/src/tok-mwe.xfst
# -------------------------------------------------------
# Multiwords for standard tokenizer (GERMAN)
#
# AUTHOR:	A. Schiller
# ENCODING:	UTF-8
# UPDATE:	29-Jun-1999
# UPDATE:	02-Aug-2006	(converted to UTF-8)
# -------------------------------------------------------

# ---------------------------------------------------------
echo >>> list of multi words
define EXPR [
  {a. Chr.}
| {à la carte}
| {à la mode}
| {a priori}
| {ad hoc} 
| {Alma Mater}
| {Alter Ego}
| {cum laude}
| {cum tempore}
| {Curriculum Vitae}
| {d. h.}
| {da capo}
| {da capo al fine}
| {de facto}
| {Deus ex Machina}
| {en bloc}
| {en détail}
| {en gros}
| {en passant}
| {en vogue}
| {et cetera}
| {et al.}
| {ex abrupto}
| {ex aequo}
| {ex cathedra}
| {ex nihilo}
| {extra muros}
| {Fast Food}
| {gang und gäbe} 
| {Gentleman's Agreement} (s)
| {Gentlemen's Agreement} (s)
| {Hab und Gut}
| {Habeas corpus}
| {Happy End}
| {hau ruck}
| {ho ruck}
| {honoris causa}
| {in Bezug auf}
| {in bezug auf}
| {intra muros}
| {ipso facto}
| {ipso jure}
| {Jet Set}
| {n. Chr.}
| {Persona grata}
| {Persona ingrata}
| {Persona non grata}
| {Rock and Roll} (s)
| {Rock 'n' Roll} (s)
| {summa cum laude}
| {u. a.}
| {u. ä.}
| {u. U.}
| {v. Chr.}
| {von seiten}
| {von Seiten}
| {Who's who}
| {z. B.}
| {z. H.}
| {z. Z.}
| {zu seiten}
| {zu Seiten}

# new 13-Jul-2006 (AS)
| {km/h}
| {m/s}
];

echo >>> some proper names
define PROP [
  {Addis Abeba}
| {Alma Ata}
| {Bad Berleburg}
| {Bad Bertrich}
| {Bad Driburg}
| {Bad Harzburg}
| {Bad Hersfeld}
| {Bad Homburg}
| {Bad Honnef}
| {Bad Kissingen}
| {Bad Kreuznach}
| {Bad Langensalza}
| {Bad Lippspringe}
| {Bad Meinberg}
| {Bad Mergentheim}
| {Bad Nauheim}
| {Bad Neuenahr-Ahrweiler}
| {Bad Oeynhausen}
| {Bad Oldesloe}
| {Bad Pyrmont}
| {Bad Salzuflen}
| {Bad Salzungen}
| {Bad Schwartau}
| {Bad Vilbel}
| {Bad Zwischenahn}
| {Bandar Seri Begawan}
| {Bergisch Gladbach}
| {Beverly Hills}
| {Buenos Aires}
| {Burkina Faso}
| {Christie's}
| {Costa Rica}
| {Côte d'Ivoire}
| {Dalai Lama}
| {El Salvador}
| {Kansas City}
| {Kap Verde}
| {Kuala Lumpur}
| {La Paz}
| {Las Vegas}
| {Long Island}
| {Los Alamos}
| {Los Angeles}
| {MacDonald's}
| {Maxim's}
| {Neu Delhi}
| {New York}
| {Oklahoma City}
| {Palo Alto}
| {Pearl Harbor}
| {Phnom Penh}
| {Porta Westfalica}
| {Port Louis}
| {Port Moresby}
| {Puerto Rico}
| {Rhode Island}
| {Rio de Janeiro}
| {Saint George's}
| {Saint John's}
| {Saint Kitts}
| {San Francisco}
| {San Jose}
| {San Juan}
| {Sankt Augustin}
| {Sankt Ingbert}
| {Sankt Petersburg}
| {Sankt Wendel}
| {San Marino}
| {San Salvador}
| {Santa Cruz}
| {Santo Domingo}
| {Sao Paolo}
| {Sao Tome}
| {São Tomé}
| {Schwäbisch Gmünd}
| {Schwäbisch Hall}
| {Sierra Leone}
| {Sri Lanka}
| {Tel Aviv}
| {Ulan Bator}
| {Weil am Rhein}
| {Weil der Stadt}
];

# ---------------------------------------------------------
echo >>> numeric expressions

define Dig	[ %0 | 1 | 2 | 3 | 4 | 5 | 6 | 7 | 8 | 9 ] ;

define Triple1  Dig (Dig) (Dig) ;
define Triple	Dig Dig Dig ;

define NUM	[   [Triple1] [" " Triple]+ (%.) ];

# ------------------------------------------------------------------------
echo >>> define dates

define SP	" ";

define Dig1	Dig - %0 ;
	
define Month	[ (%0) Dig1 | 1 [%0 | 1 | 2 ] ] %. ;

define Year	[ ([ Dig (Dig)] | %` |%' ) Dig Dig ] ;

define Day	[ (%0) Dig1 | [1|2] Dig | 3 [%0|1] ] %.  ;

define DATE [ 
  Day SP Month (SP Year) 
];


# ------------------------------------------------------------------------
echo >>> initial upper case
define CAP [
     a (->) A, b (->) B, c (->) C, d (->) D, e (->) E, f (->) F,
     g (->) G, h (->) H, i (->) I, j (->) J, k (->) K, l (->) L,
     m (->) M, n (->) N, o (->) O, p (->) P, q (->) Q, r (->) R,
     s (->) S, t (->) T, u (->) U, v (->) V, w (->) W, x (->) X,
     y (->) Y, z (->) Z, ä (->) Ä, ö (->) Ö, ü (->) Ü,
     à (->) [A|a]	  || .#. _ 
] ;

# ------------------------------------------------------------------------
echo >>> simple SGML tags
define CHAR 	[A|B|C|D|E|F|G|H|I|J|K|L|M|N|O|P|Q|R|S|T|U|V|W|X|Y|Z
		|a|b|c|d|e|f|g|h|i|j|k|l|m|n|o|p|q|r|s|t|u|v|w|x|y|z
		];
define SGML [ %< (%/) CHAR [CHAR|Dig]* %> ];


# ------------------------------------------------------------------------
echo >>> URLS
define CHAR1	[ CHAR | Dig 
		| %_ | %* | %~ | %/ | %+ | %% | %& | %= | %$ ]; 

# characters which must not apear at the end of URL 
define CHAR0	[ %. |  %? | %: | %- ];

define URL	[
	[ {http} | {ftp} | {file} | {mailto} ]
	%: [CHAR0|CHAR1]* CHAR1 ];

	
# ------------------------------------------------------------------------
define CHAR2	CHAR1 | Ä | Ö | Ü | ä | ö | ü | ß | %- ;

echo >>> combine
read regex [
    	[ EXPR .o. CAP ].l
|   	PROP
|   	NUM CHAR2* 
|   	DATE
| 	SGML
| 	URL
];
